Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201571-2481
Drugs; manufacture or possession of adulterated or misbranded drugs; sale prohibited.

No person shall, within this state, manufacture for sale therein or have in his or her possession with intent to sell, offer or expose for sale, or sell any remedies, medicines, or drugs which are adulterated or misbranded.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 12, p. 561;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-931;

R.S.1943, § 81-624;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-2405;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 25.
August 30, 2015